Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2917
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Insurance shall be empowered to adopt and promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of sections 44-2901 to 44-2918.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 17.